Virginia statutes. Title 4.1. Alcoholic Beverage and Cannabis Control.
Chapter 13. Prohibited Practices; Procedural Matters.

§ 4.1-1302.
Search without warrant; odor of marijuana.

No law-enforcement officer, as defined in §

9.1-101

, may lawfully stop, search, or seize any person, place, or thing and no search warrant may be issued solely on the basis of the odor of marijuana and no evidence discovered or obtained pursuant to a violation of this subsection, including evidence discovered or obtained with the person’s consent, shall be admissible in any trial, hearing, or other proceeding.

The provisions of subsection A shall not apply in any airport as defined in § 5.1-1 or if the violation occurs in a commercial motor vehicle as defined in §

46.2-341.4

.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550, 551.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and
551, cl. 7 provides: “That, except for (i) the provisions of Article 29 ( §

2.2-2499.1

et seq.) of Chapter 24 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act,
§§

4.1-600

through

4.1-628

,

4.1-1100

,

4.1-1101

,

4.1-1101

.1,

4.1-1105.1

,

4.1-1107

through

4.1-1110

,

4.1-1112

,

4.1-1120

,

4.1-1121

, and

4.1-1302

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, Chapter 15 ( §

4.1-1500

et seq.) of Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act,
§§

15.2-1627

,
16.1-69.48:1,
16.1-228,
16.1-278.8:01,

18.2-251.02

,

18.2-308.09

,

18.2-308.1:5

,

19.2-389.3

,

19.2-392.1

,

19.2-392.4

, and

24.2-233

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act,
§§

19.2-392.2:1

,

19.2-392.2:2

, and

46.2-341.20:7

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and
§

54.1-3442.6

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and (ii) the repeal of
§

18.2-250.1

of the Code of Virginia, the provisions of the first, third, fourth, fifth, sixth, and eleventh enactments of this act shall not become effective unless reenacted by the 2022 Session of the General Assembly. The provisions of
§§

4.1-1101.1

and

4.1-1105.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall expire on January 1, 2024, if the provisions of the first, third, and fourth enactments of this act are reenacted by the 2022 Session of the General Assembly.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and
551, cl. 8 provides: “That (i) the provisions of the second enactment of this act, (ii) the provisions of Article 29 ( §

2.2-2499.1

et seq.) of Chapter 24 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act,
§§

4.1-600

through

4.1-628

,

4.1-1100

,

4.1-1101

,

4.1-1101

.1,

4.1-1105.1

,

4.1-1107

through

4.1-1110

,

4.1-1112

,

4.1-1120

,

4.1-1121

, and

4.1-1302

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, Chapter 15 ( §

4.1-1500

et seq.) of Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act,
§§

15.2-1627

,
16.1-69.48:1,
16.1-228,
16.1-278.8:01,

18.2-251.02

,

18.2-308.09

, and

18.2-308.1:5

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act,
§

46.2-341.20:7

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and
§

54.1-3442.6

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and (iii) the repeal of
§

18.2-250.1

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and
551, cl. 26 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to
§ 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 1289 of the Acts of Assembly of 2020 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to
§ 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice. The provisions of this enactment shall become effective in due course.”